Hawaii statutes.
§51-3 Effect of amendment. The
amendments provided in section 51-2 shall not be construed to amend or affect
any other provision of the franchise referred to in section 51-2. [L 1967, c
300, §3; HRS §51-3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next